Missouri, session 2026, SB1283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.326, to read as
follows:
537.326. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context provides otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Inherent risks of motocross activities", those
dangers, hazards, or conditions that are an integral part of
motocross activities, including, but not limited to:
(a) Cold weather or heat-related injuries and
illnesses, including hypothermia, frostbite, heat
exhaustion, heat stroke, and dehydration;
(b) An "act of nature" which may include rock fall,
inclement weather, thunder and lightning, severe or varied
temperature, weather conditions, and winds including
tornadoes;
(c) Operator error;
(d) Attack or bite by animals;
(e) The aggravation of injuries or illnesses because
they occurred in remote places where there are no available
medical facilities;

SB 1283 2
(2) "Facility operator", any individual, group, club,
partnership, corporation, or business entity, whether or not
operating for profit or not-for-profit, or any employee or
agent thereof, which sponsors, organizes, rents, or provides
to the general public the opportunity to use any motocross
vehicle by a participant at a motocross facility;
(3) "Motocross activity", riding on, training in or
on, using, or being a passenger on a motocross vehicle
during:
(a) A competition, exercise, or undertaking that
involves a motocross vehicle; or
(b) Training or teaching activities regarding the
operation of a motocross vehicle at a motocross facility;
(4) "Motocross facility", an area created and
maintained for the operation of motocross vehicles on
natural or man-made terrain for recreation and for which a
fee is charged for access;
(5) "Motocross vehicle", any motorized two-wheel
vehicle being operated over terrain created and maintained
for recreational use by operators of a motocross facility;
(6) "Participant", any person, whether an amateur or
professional, whether or not a fee is paid, which rents,
leases, or uses a motocross vehicle or is a passenger on a
rented, leased, or used motocross vehicle while
participating in a motocross activity.
2. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,
a facility operator shall not be liable for any injury to or
the death of a participant resulting from the inherent risks
of motocross activities and, except as provided in
subsection 4 of this section, no participant or a
participant's representative shall make any claim against,
maintain any action against, or recover from a facility

SB 1283 3
operator for injury, loss, damage, or death of the
participant resulting from any of the inherent risks of
motocross activities.
3. This section shall not apply to any employer-
employee relationship governed by the provisions of chapter
287.
4. The provisions of subsection 2 of this section
shall not prevent or limit the liability of a facility
operator that:
(1) Intentionally injures the participant;
(2) Commits an act or omission that constitutes
negligence for the safety of a participant in a motocross
activity and that negligence is the proximate cause of the
injury or death of a participant;
(3) Provides unsafe equipment or an unsafe motocross
vehicle to a participant and knew or should have known that
the furnished equipment or motocross vehicle was unsafe; or
(4) Fails to use that degree of care that an
ordinarily careful and prudent person would use under the
same or similar circumstances.
5. Every facility operator shall post and maintain
signs which contain the warning notice specified in this
subsection. Such signs shall be placed in a clearly visible
location on or near areas where the facility operator
conducts motocross activities. The warning notice specified
in this subsection shall appear on the sign in black letters
on a white background with each letter to be a minimum of
one inch in height. The signs and contracts described in
this subsection shall contain the following warning notice:
"WARNING

SB 1283 4
Under Missouri law, a facility operator is not
liable for an injury to or the death of a
participant in motocross activities resulting from
the inherent risks of motocross activities pursuant
to the Revised Statutes of Missouri.".
6. This section shall not be construed to limit or
modify any defense or immunity already existing in statute
or common law or to affect any claim occurring prior to
August 28, 2026.
✓